Utah statutes.
17-27a-607.   Dedication of streets and other public places.
(1)  Plats, when made, acknowledged, and recorded according to the procedures
specified in this part, operate as a dedication of all streets and other
public places, and vest the fee of those parcels of land in the county for the
public for the uses named or intended in those plats.
(2)  The dedication established by this section does not impose liability upon
the county for streets and other public places that are dedicated in this
manner but are unimproved.
